Tennessee, session 114, HB2377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-518(a)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(A) Engaging in three (3) or more incidents of sexual abuse of one (1) or more
minor children on separate occasions; provided, that at least one (1) such incident
occurred within the county in which the charge is filed and that one (1) such incident
occurred on or after July 1, 2026; and
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-518(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(b) A person commits continuous sexual abuse of a child who, during a period
that is thirty (30) days or more in duration, engages in multiple acts of sexual abuse of a
child as defined in subdivision (a)(1).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-518(e), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(e) The jury must agree unanimously that during a period that is thirty (30) days
or more in duration, the defendant committed multiple acts of sexual abuse of a child as
defined in subdivision (a)(1).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to acts committed on or after that date.
HB2377
010793
- 1 -